Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 1 General Provisions

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

21 Am. Jur. 2d Criminal Law § 1 et seq.; 77 Am. Jur. 2d Venue §§ 38, 39.

22 C.J.S. Criminal Law § 1 et seq.

§ 7-1-101.
Payment of costs accruing from change of venue.

The costs accruing from a change of venue shall be paid by the county in which the indictment was found or the information filed.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 116; R.S. 1887, § 3276; R.S. 1899, § 5336; C.S. 1910, § 6200; C.S. 1920, § 7497; R.S. 1931, § 33-601; C.S. 1945, § 10-1001; W.S. 1957, § 7-4; W.S. 1977, §

7-1-104

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to venue in criminal cases generally, see §

1-7-102

.

As to transfer from county for trial, see Rule 21, W.R. Cr. P.

Costs include allowance to special prosecuting attorney. —

Statute contemplates that “costs” on change of venue shall include reasonable allowance for special assistant prosecuting attorney. Board of Comm'rs v. Board of Comm'rs, 40 Wyo. 144, 275 P. 102,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1929).

Payment of special prosecutor's fee by county to which venue was changed was not “voluntary payment” and was recoverable from county in which prosecution commenced. Board of Comm'rs v. Board of Comm'rs, 40 Wyo. 144, 275 P. 102,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1929).

Order as to costs is only prima facie correct. —

Ex parte order of district court to which venue was changed fixing fee of prosecutor's assistant is only prima facie correct as against county liable. Board of Comm'rs v. Board of Comm'rs, 40 Wyo. 144, 275 P. 102,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1929).

County in which indictment was found audits costs. —

Inasmuch as a county in which an indictment is found is liable for costs of the trial, upon change of venue to another county, the board of the former county is that which should audit and allow claims for such costs. Stoll v. Board of Comm'rs, 6 Wyo. 231, 44 P. 58,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1896).

Change of venue bars trial on second information. —

Where venue has been changed, the county from which the change is taken loses jurisdiction to proceed to try the accused on a second information charging same offense. Keefe v. District Court of Judicial Dist., 16 Wyo. 381, 94 P. 459,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1908).

Information may be amended in new county. —

The right to amend an information in the new county is as broad as right would have been had no change been taken. State v. Kusel, 29 Wyo. 287, 213 P. 367,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1923).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of state to certiorari to compel change of venue in criminal case, 91 ALR2d 1095.

Right of accused in misdemeanor prosecution to change of venue on grounds of inability to secure fair trial and the like, 34 ALR3d 804.

State's right to change of venue in criminal case, 46 ALR3d 295.

Power of state trial court in criminal case to change venue on its own motion, 74 ALR4th 1023.

§ 7-1-102.
Record of information for ascertaining condition of crime in state.

All town, city, county and state law enforcement agencies, district courts, courts of limited jurisdiction, district attorneys, state adult and juvenile correctional institutions and state and local probation and parole agencies shall maintain a public record of crime and criminals and the operation of the criminal justice system. The attorney general shall provide uniform forms for reporting all information necessary to obtain reliable statistics to ascertain the true condition of the crime situation in the state. The officer, agency or court shall furnish the information requested by the attorney general, except that upon implementation of a case management system in a circuit or district court that has the capability of transferring information electronically, the supreme court shall, on behalf of the circuit or district court, furnish the abstract of the court record to the attorney general as required under W.S. 7-19-107(k).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 229,§ 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-10.1; W.S. 1977, § 7-1-122; Laws 1987, ch. 157,§ 3; 2020 ch. 4, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added “except that upon implementation of a case management system in a circuit or district court that has the capability of transferring information electronically, the supreme court shall, on behalf of the circuit or district court, furnish the abstract of the court record to the attorney general as required under W.S. 7-19-107(k)” at the end.

§ 7-1-103.
Payment of costs in misdemeanor cases.

In all misdemeanor cases the county shall pay the costs if the defendant is acquitted.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 7-1-123.

§ 7-1-104.
Custody of convict charged with offense committed while in state penal institution.

If any convict in a state penal institution is charged with any crime committed while confined therein, the convict shall remain in the custody of the department of corrections and shall remain confined in the institution unless otherwise directed by the director of the department or by order of the court in which the indictment or information is filed.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 211; R.S. 1887, § 3257; R.S. 1899, § 5316; C.S. 1910, § 6180; C.S. 1920, § 7477; R.S. 1931, § 33-430; C.S. 1945, § 10-803; W.S. 1957, § 7-180; W.S. 1977, §

7-9-101

; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4; 1992, ch. 25, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to prosecution by indictment, see art. 1, § 13, Wyo. Const.

As to Wyoming state penitentiary, see §

25-1-201

.

Cited

in

State v. Keefe, 17 Wyo. 227, 98 P. 122,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 16

, 22 L.R.A. (n.s.) 896 (1908).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state statute criminalizing possession of contraband by individual in penal or correctional institution, 45 ALR5th 767.

§ 7-1-105.
Representation of minor pleading guilty.

In no criminal case in the district court shall a plea of guilty be received or accepted from a minor unless the minor is represented by counsel.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 90, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 7-183.3; W.S. 1977, §

7-9-107

; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Modern status of rules and standards in state courts as to adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client, 2 ALR4th 27.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client regarding right to and incidents of jury trial, 3 ALR4th 601.

Right of accused in criminal prosecution to presence of counsel at court-appointed or -approved psychiatric examination, 3 ALR4th 910.

Power of court to change counsel appointed for indigent, against objections of accused and original counsel, 3 ALR4th 1227.

§ 7-1-106.
Prosecution of crimes.

Crimes shall be prosecuted by indictment, information, complaint or citation as provided by the rules promulgated by the Wyoming supreme court.

All prosecutions shall be carried on in the name and by the authority of the state of Wyoming and shall conclude “against the peace and dignity of the state of Wyoming”.

All matters relating to the content and form of indictments, informations and complaints shall be governed by the rules promulgated by the Wyoming supreme court.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 123, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 5189; C.S. 1910, § 6128; C.S. 1920, § 7425; R.S. 1931, § 33-401; C.S. 1945, § 10-601; W.S. 1957, § 7-118; W.S. 1977, §

7-6-101

; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 1987, ch. 157, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to prosecution by indictment, see art. 1, § 13, Wyo. Const.

For Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure, see the

Wyoming Court Rules Annotated

.

Constitutionality. —

Statute providing that all crimes, misdemeanors and offenses may be prosecuted either by indictment or information and that no grand jury shall “hereafter” be summoned unless ordered by the court does not disparage any substantial right or constitutional guaranty, and is not ex post facto. In re Wright, 3 Wyo. 478, 27 P. 565,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1891) (decided under prior law).

Prosecution by information permitted. —

A judgment of conviction cannot be attacked as having been obtained without due process of law because procedure was by information instead of by indictment. In re Boulter, 5 Wyo. 329, 40 P. 520,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1895).

Document filed in county court, then district court, invokes both courts' jurisdiction. —

A charging document in the county court in a felony prosecution which was titled an information and which then was filed in the district court only as a part of the record transmitted to the district court by the county court was sufficient to invoke the jurisdiction of either the county court or the district court. Cheatham v. State, 719 P.2d 612,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 553

(Wyo. 1986) (decided under prior law).

Cited in

Webster v. State, 2016 WY 76, 376 P.3d 488,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 2016).

Stated

in

Barnes v. State, 642 P.2d 1263,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 343

(Wyo. 1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Limitations on state prosecuting attorney's discretion to initiate prosecution by indictment or by information, 44 ALR4th 401.

§ 7-1-107.
Detention of juvenile offenders.

Effective July 1, 1995, no minor charged with a status offense as defined by subsection (b) of this section shall be detained in a jail.

As used in W.S.

7-1-107

and

7-1-108

:

“Juvenile detention facility” means any facility which may legally and physically restrict and house a child, other than the Wyoming boys” school, the Wyoming girls” school, the Wyoming state hospital or other private or public psychiatric facility within the state of Wyoming. “Juvenile detention facility” does not include any residential treatment facility which is operated for the primary purpose of providing treatment to a child. A juvenile detention facility may be housed within an adult jail or correction facility if the facility otherwise meets the requirements of state law;

“Minor” means an individual who is under the age of eighteen (18) years;

“Status offense” means an offense which, if committed by an adult, would not constitute an act punishable as a criminal offense by the laws of this state or a violation of a municipal ordinance, but does not include a violation of W.S. 12-6-101(b) or (c) or any similar municipal ordinance;

“Hardware secure juvenile detention facility” means a facility used for the detention of minors that is characterized by locks on the doors and other restrictive hardware designed to restrict the movement of the minors and protect public safety;

“Shelter care” means as defined in W.S. 14-6-201(a)(xxii);

“Staff secure juvenile detention facility” means a facility used for the detention of minors that is characterized by a trained staff to supervise the movement and activities of detained minors at the facility, without the additional use of hardware secure equipment.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 210, § 1; 1995, ch. 122, § 2; ch. 150, § 1; 1996, ch. 106, § 1; 1997, ch. 149, § 1; 1998, ch. 7, § 1; 2010, ch. 22, § 1; 2016 ch. 56, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (b)(iv) through (b)(vi).

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, added second sentence in (b)(i).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 205, as amended by Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 2, appropriates $400,000 for fiscal year 2005-2006, to be expended by the department of education to continue the provision of educational programs and services to children placed in juvenile detention facilities commencing the day following the detention hearing, as originally authorized under and subject to conditions and limitations prescribed by Laws 2004, ch. 111, § 3(b). Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from this appropriation existing on June 30, 2005, are to be reappropriated and expended only for these purposes.

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 205.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Treatment, under Federal Juvenile Delinquency Act (18 USCS §§ 5031-5042), of juvenile alleged to have violated law of United States, 137 ALR Fed 481.

§ 7-1-108.
Incarceration of juvenile offenders.

Effective July 1, 1995, no minor convicted of a status offense as defined by W.S. 7-1-107(b) shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment.

A minor convicted of a misdemeanor or of violating a municipal ordinance, other than a status offense, for which a term of imprisonment is authorized, shall only be imprisoned in a juvenile detention facility.

Except for an alleged delinquent minor who is released to the custody of the minor’s parent, guardian or custodian, with verbal counsel, warning or a written promise to appear in court, the person taking the minor into custody shall ensure a juvenile detention risk assessment shall be promptly performed, using a uniform assessment instrument designed by the county sheriffs. If the risk assessment finds that the minor is a serious risk to himself or to the safety of others, the minor may be:

Placed in a hardware or staff secure juvenile detention facility;

Transferred to a medical facility if the minor is believed to be suffering from a serious physical or mental illness that requires prompt diagnosis or treatment;

If the minor is not held pursuant to paragraph (i) of this subsection, placed in shelter care or a staff secure juvenile detention facility, or released to a parent, guardian or other custodian who can provide supervision and care for the minor pending the minor’s appearance in court. If no space is available in shelter care or a staff secure juvenile detention facility, the minor may be held in a hardware secure juvenile detention facility.

A minor under the age of eleven (11) years shall not be held in a hardware secure juvenile detention facility. If the minor under the age of eleven (11) years poses a substantial risk of harm to himself or others, a peace officer may detain and transport the minor for an emergency mental health evaluation.

If a minor is taken into custody and is not released to the minor’s parent, guardian or custodian, the person taking the minor into custody shall give notice thereof to the minor’s parent, guardian or custodian as soon as possible, and in no case later than twenty-four (24) hours after taking the minor into custody.

The county sheriffs shall report on and the department of family services shall collect and analyze data regarding the application of the juvenile detention risk assessment instruments specified under W.S. 5-6-113(c) and subsection (c) of this section and shall report to the joint judiciary interim committee annually beginning January 1, 2011 and every January 1 thereafter.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 210, § 1; 1995, ch. 150, § 1; 2010, ch. 22, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (c) through (f).

§ 7-1-109.
Examination for sexually transmitted diseases required in certain cases; health officers to notify crime victims; results confidential.

Upon the consent of a person accused of any crime wherein it is alleged that there has been an exchange of bodily fluids, that person shall be examined as soon as practicable, but not later than forty-eight (48) hours after the date on which the information or indictment is presented, for sexually transmitted diseases included within the list of reportable diseases developed by rule and regulation of the department of health pursuant to W.S. 35-4-130(b).

For cases in which a person is accused of any crime wherein it is alleged that there has been an exchange of bodily fluids and the accused person is unwilling or unable to give consent as provided in subsection (a) of this section, or when, for any reason it is impractical to seek consent under subsection (a) of this section, the court may by warrant, upon a sufficient showing of probable cause by affidavit, at any time of day or night, order the medical examination of the accused person for sexually transmitted diseases included within the list of reportable diseases developed by rule and regulation of the department of health pursuant to W.S. 35-4-130(b). Testing for sexually transmitted diseases done under this subsection shall be conducted as soon as practicable, but no later than forty-eight (48) hours after the date on which the information or indictment is presented.

Any person convicted of a sex offense shall, at the request of the victim, be examined as soon as practicable, but not later than forty-eight (48) hours after the conviction for sexually transmitted diseases included in the list specified in subsection (a) of this section. The victim shall make the request to the district attorney responsible for prosecuting the offense. If the offender is unwilling or unable to consent to the examination the district attorney shall petition the court for an order requiring the offender to submit to the examination.

Any examination performed under this section shall be performed by a licensed physician or other health care provider. The examination shall be in accordance with procedures prescribed by the department of health under W.S.

35-4-130

through

35-4-134

and the examination results shall be reported to the appropriate health officer. Upon receipt of the examination results, the health officer shall notify the victim, the alleged victim or if a minor, the parents or guardian of the victim or the alleged victim. Additional testing under this section shall be performed as medically appropriate and shall be made available in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Costs of any medical examination undertaken pursuant to this section shall be funded through the department of health. If the court finds that the offender is able to reimburse the department, the offender shall reimburse the department for the costs of any medical examination under this section.

All results which are or can be derived from the examination ordered pursuant to this section are confidential, are not admissible as evidence and shall not be disclosed except:

As provided by this section;

As provided by W.S. 35-4-132(d);

In a civil action for the negligent or intentional infliction of or exposure to a sexually transmitted disease;

In a criminal prosecution for the criminal infliction of or exposure to a sexually transmitted disease; or

As otherwise provided by law.

As used in this section:

“Convicted” includes pleas of guilty, nolo contendere and verdicts of guilty upon which a judgment of conviction may be rendered, and includes juvenile adjudications of delinquency if the adjudication is based upon an act which would constitute a sex offense. “Convicted” shall also include dispositions pursuant to W.S.

7-13-301

;

“Sex offense” means sexual assault under W.S.

6-2-302

through

6-2-304

, attempted sexual assault, conspiracy to commit sexual assault, incest under W.S.

6-4-402

or sexual abuse of a minor under W.S.

6-2-314

through

6-2-317

.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 82, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

7-8-106

; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

7-1-107

; Laws 1993, ch. 173, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2007, ch. 159, § 2; 2011, ch. 17, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (g)(ii), substituted “6-2-304” for “6-2-305.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (g)(ii), substituted “sexual abuse of a minor” for “indecent liberties” and substituted “6-2-314 through

6-2-317

” for “14-3-105” at the end of the sentence.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), inserted “but not later than forty-eight (48) hours after the date on which the information or indictment is presented”; added the present last sentence in (b) and (d); and in (c), inserted “but not later than forty-eight (48) hours.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1993, ch. 173, § 1, renumbered this section as §

7-1-107

; however, this section was redesignated as §

7-1-109

in light of the enactment of §

7-1-107

by Laws 1993, ch. 210, § 1.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”